Washington statutes.
RCW 18.130.360

Retired volunteer medical worker license—Supervision—Rules.

(1) As used in this section, "emergency or disaster" has the same meaning as in RCW 38.52.010.

(2) The secretary shall issue a retired volunteer medical worker license to any applicant who:

(a) Has held an active license issued by a disciplining authority under RCW 18.130.040 no more than ten years prior to applying for an initial license under this section;

(b) Does not have any current restrictions on the ability to obtain a license for violations of this chapter; and

(c) Submits proof of registration as a volunteer with a local organization for emergency services or management as defined by chapter 38.52 RCW.

(3) License holders under this section must be supervised and may practice only those duties that correspond to the scope of their emergency worker assignment not to exceed their scope of practice prior to retirement.

(4) The department shall adopt rules and policies to implement this section.

(5) The department shall establish standards for the renewal of licenses issued under this section, including continuing competency requirements.

(6) License holders under this section are subject to the provisions of this chapter as they may apply to the issuance and denial of credentials, unauthorized practice, and discipline for acts of unprofessional conduct.

(7) Nothing in this section precludes a health care professional who holds an active license from providing medical services during an emergency or disaster.

(8) The cost of regulatory activities for license holders under this section must be borne in equal proportion by all health care providers holding a license issued by a disciplining authority under RCW 18.130.040.

[ 2006 c 72 s 1.]